Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-1301
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 15-1301 to 15-1307, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) City shall mean any city of the primary class;

(2) Federal government shall mean the United States of America, or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America; and

(3) Community development activity shall mean any activity authorized in the Community Development Law, construction of community facilities, conservation and rehabilitation of property, neighborhood development, code enforcement, and all of the jurisdiction and authority granted a housing authority under Chapter 71, article 15.

Laws 1974, LB 825, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 2.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.